Washington statutes.
RCW 36.110.100

Comprehensive work programs.

Cities and counties participating in jail industries are authorized to provide for comprehensive work programs using jail inmate workers at worksites within jail facilities or at such places within the city or county as may be directed by the legislative authority of the city or county, as similarly provided under RCW 36.28.100.

[ 1993 c 285 s 10.]